Idaho, session 2025, H0046.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-1510, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-1510. PROVIDING SHELTER TO RUNAWAY CHILDREN. (1) A person who know-
ingly or intentionally provides housing or other accommodations to a child
seventeen (17) years of age or younger without the authority of: (a) the cus-
todial parent or guardian of the child; (b) the state of Idaho or a political
subdivision thereof; or (c) the one having legal custody of the child shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor. Nothing contained in this section shall be con-
strued to prevent the lawful detention of a minor child or the rendering of
emergency aid or assistance to a minor child. It shall be an affirmative de-
fense to the provisions of this section that the person providing housing
or other accommodations to the child has notified the custodial parent or
guardian or the county sheriff or city police of the child's whereabouts. It
shall also be an affirmative defense to the provisions of this section that
the person providing housing or other accommodations to the child notices
reasonable evidence that the child has been abused by the custodial parent or
guardian.
(2)(a) Licensed children's residential care facilities, registered
children's institutions, and behavioral health youth crisis centers
providing emergency runaway services are not guilty of a violation of
this section if:
(i) The child is a runaway who consents to shelter, care, or li-
censed service;
(ii) (i) The facility attempts to contact and is unable to lo-
cate the child's parent or legal guardian or the child refuses to
disclose the contact information of the child's parent or legal
guardian; and
(iii) (ii) The facility has notified the county sheriff or police
of the child's whereabouts pursuant to local laws and licensure
requirements.
(b) Licensed children's residential care facilities, registered chil-
dren's institutions, and behavioral health youth crisis centers are
still required to comply with reporting requirements pursuant to sec-
tion 16-1605, Idaho Code.


(c) As used in this subsection:
(i) "Behavioral health youth crisis center" means a voluntary
outpatient facility operated twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven
(7) days a week, and three hundred sixty-five (365) days a year
to provide evaluation, intervention, and referral for youth sev-
enteen (17) years of age or younger who are experiencing a crisis
due to a behavioral health condition. The facility may not provide
services to a youth client for more than twenty-three (23) hours
and fifty-nine (59) minutes in a single episode of care.
(ii) "Licensed children's residential care facility" has the same
meaning as in section 39-1202, Idaho Code.
(iii) "Registered children's institution" has the same meaning as
in section 39-1202, Idaho Code.
(3) A person convicted of a violation of the provisions of this sec-
tion shall be punished by imprisonment for a period not in excess of six (6)
months, a fine not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both
such fine and imprisonment and fine. Additionally, any real property uti-
lized in violation of the provisions of this section may be declared a public
nuisance pursuant to chapter 1, title 52, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.